Alabama, session 2026rs, HB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Until January 18, 2027, the Sheriff of
Talladega County shall continue to receive the same base
annual salary the sheriff is receiving on May 31, 2025.
(b) Beginning on the effective date of this act, in
addition to the base annual salary authorized in subsection
(a), the sheriff shall receive an expense allowance of fifteen
thousand two hundred dollars and thirty-two cents ($15,200.32)
per annum, payable in equal monthly installments from the
county general fund.
(c) Beginning January 18, 2027, the sheriff shall
receive a base annual salary of one hundred twelve thousand
dollars ($112,000) per annum, payable in equal monthly
installments from the county general fund, and the salary and
expense allowance authorized in subsections (a) and (b) are
Page 1

expense allowance authorized in subsections (a) and (b) are
HB365 Enrolled
void.
Section 2. Act 188, 1957 Regular Session (Acts 1957, p.
240), Act 865, 1978 Regular Session (Acts 1978, p. 1294), Act
93-565, 1993 Regular Session (Acts 1993, p. 944), Act 98-477,
1998 Regular Session (Acts 1998, p. 919), Act 98-574, 1998
Regular Session (Acts 1998, p. 1278), Acts 2001-466, 2001
Regular Session (Acts 2001, p. 621), Act 2004-435, 2004
Regular Session (Acts 2004, p. 435), Act 2009-374, 2009
Regular Session (Acts 2009, p. 698), and Act 2021-466, 2021
Regular Session, relating to the compensation of the Sheriff
of Talladega County, are repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB365 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3